Maryland, session 2026, HB1578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 14–301.1 of Article – State Finance and Procurement of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–404.
(i) (1) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
[(1)] (2) To the extent practicable and authorized by the U.S.
Constitution, a cannabis licensee shall comply with the State’s Minority Business
Enterprise Program.
[(2)] (3) The Administration, in consultation with the certification agency
designated by the Board of Public Works under § 14–303(b) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs, the General Assembly, and the Office of the Attorney General, shall review the
disparity study required by Chapter 26 of the Acts of 2022, AND ANY FUTURE DISPARITY
STUDIES OR RELATED ANALYSES, to evaluate whether application of the State’s Minority
Business Enterprise Program to cannabis licenses would comply with the City of Richmond
v. J.A. Croson Co., 488 U.S. 469, and any subsequent federal or constitutional
requirements.
[(3)] (4) On or before 6 months after the issuance of a cannabis license
under § 36–401 of this subtitle, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and the Office of
Social Equity within the Administration and the cannabis licensee, shall establish a clear
plan for setting reasonable and appropriate minority business enterprise participation
goals and procedures for the procurement of goods and services related to cannabis,
including the cultivation, manufacturing, and dispensing of cannabis.
– 3 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(4)] (5) To the extent practicable, the goals and procedures specified in
paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection shall be based on the requirements of Title 14,
Subtitle 3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the regulations implementing
that subtitle.
(6) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2031, THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT AND MAY NOT BE ENFORCED.
Article – Public Utilities
7–704.1.
(j) (1) The findings and evidence relied on by the General Assembly for the
continuation of the Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article are incorporated in this subsection.
(2) To the extent practicable and authorized by the United States
Constitution, approved applicants for a proposed offshore wind project shall comply with
the State’s Minority Business Enterprise Program.
(3) (i) On or before 6 months after the issuance of an order approving
an OREC application, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and an approved applicant,
shall establish a clear plan for setting reasonable and appropriate minority business
enterprise participation goals and procedures for each phase of the qualified offshore wind
project.
(ii) To the extent practicable, the goals and procedures specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be based on the requirements of Title 14, Subtitle
3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the regulations implementing that
subtitle.
(iii) Every 6 months following the issuance of an order approving an
OREC application, an approved applicant shall submit a report on its progress establishing
and implementing minority business enterprise goals and procedures to the Commission.
(4) On and after July 1, [2026] 2031, the provisions of this subsection and
any regulations adopted in accordance with this subsection shall be of no effect and may
not be enforced.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10A–404.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(a) The findings and evidence relied on by the General Assembly for the
continuation of the Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of this
article are hereby incorporated.
(b) To the extent practicable and permitted by the United States Constitution,
the provisions of the Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of
this article shall apply to public–private partnerships established under this title.
(c) (1) The Board of Public Works may not approve a public–private
partnership agreement under § 10A–203 of this title until the reporting agency, in
consultation with the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs,
the Office of the Attorney General, and the private entity, if permissible, establishes
reasonable and appropriate minority business enterprise participation goals and
procedures for the project.
(2) To the extent practicable, goals and procedures established under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be based on the requirements of Title 14, Subtitle 3
of this article, including the implementation of regulations adopted under §§ 14–302 and
14–303 of this article.
(D) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2031, THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND
ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE OF NO
EFFECT AND MAY NOT BE ENFORCED.
14–301.1.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THE FOLLOWING:
(1) THE STATE OF MARYLAND SEEKS TO ENSURE THAT ALL CITIZENS
OF THE STATE HAVE EQUAL ACCESS TO BUSINESS FORMATION AND BUSINESS
GROWTH OPPORTUNITIES;
(2) THE ELIMINATION OF DISCRIMINATION AGAINST MINORITY– AND
WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES IS OF PARAMOUNT IMPORTANCE TO THE FUTURE
WELFARE OF ALL MARYLANDERS AND THE STATE;
(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HAS ACCEPTED AND CAREFULLY
REVIEWED THE DISPARITY STUDY ENTITLED “STATE OF MARYLAND 2025 MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE DISPARITY STUDY” (THE STUDY) AND FINDS THAT THE
STUDY PROVIDES A STRONG BASIS IN EVIDENCE DEMONSTRATING PERSISTENT
INTENTIONAL DISCRIMINATION AGAINST MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED
BUSINESSES;
– 5 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) BASED ON THE REVIEW BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE
STUDY, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(I) BASED ON RIGOROUS ECONOMETRICS ANALYSES THAT
CONTROL FOR KEY FACTORS, THERE ARE SUBSTANTIAL AND STATISTICALLY
SIGNIFICANT ADVERSE DISPARITIES THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH DISCRIMINATION
AGAINST MINORITIES AND NONMINORITY WOMEN IN WAGES, FIRM FORMATION,
ENTREPRENEURIAL EARNINGS, AND ACCESS TO CAPITAL IN THE PRIVATE SECTOR
IN THE SAME GEOGRAPHIC MARKETS AND INDUSTRY CATEGORIES IN WHICH THE
STATE DOES BUSINESS;
(II) A THOROUGH EXAMINATION OF THE LITERATURE REVEALS
SEVERE AND PERSISTENT INTENTIONAL DISPARITIES AND DISCRIMINATION IN
ACCESS TO PRIVATE BUSINESS CAPITAL MARKETS THAT IN SOME CASES HAVE BEEN
CAUSED BY GOVERNMENT POLICIES;
(III) THE STATE WOULD BECOME A PASSIVE PARTICIPANT IN
PRIVATE SECTOR RACIAL AND GENDER DISCRIMINATION IF IT CEASED OR
CURTAILED REMEDIAL EFFORTS OF THE STATE, INCLUDING THE OPERATION OF
THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM;
(IV) THERE ARE SUBSTANTIAL, ADVERSE, AND STATISTICALLY
SIGNIFICANT DISPARITIES THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH DISCRIMINATION AGAINST
MINORITIES AND NONMINORITY WOMEN IN STATE PROCUREMENT;
(V) THESE SUBSTANTIAL, ADVERSE, AND STATISTICALLY
SIGNIFICANT DISPARITIES ARE CONSISTENT WITH DISCRIMINATION AGAINST ALL
INDIVIDUAL MINORITY GROUPS AND FOR NONMINORITY WOMEN IN MOST MAJOR
INDUSTRY CATEGORIES IN STATE PROCUREMENT;
(VI) THERE IS SIGNIFICANT EVIDENCE THAT DISCRIMINATION IN
THE PRIVATE SECTOR HAS DEPRESSED FIRM FORMATION AND FIRM GROWTH
AMONG MINORITY AND NONMINORITY WOMEN ENTREPRENEURS, DECREASING THE
AVAILABILITY OF MINORITIES AND NONMINORITY WOMEN MINORITY– AND
WOMEN–OWNED FIRMS FOR PUBLIC AND PRIVATE CONTRACTING; AND
(VII) THERE IS POWERFUL AND PERSUASIVE EVIDENCE, BOTH
STATISTICAL AND QUALITATIVE, OF INTENTIONAL DISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING
DISCRIMINATION BY GOVERNMENT ACTORS, AGAINST MINORITY AND NONMINORITY
WOMEN BUSINESS OWNERS IN BOTH THE PUBLIC AND PRIVATE SECTORS;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(5) AS A RESULT OF ONGOING DISCRIMINATION AND THE
PRESENT–DAY EFFECTS OF PAST DISCRIMINATION, MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED
BUSINESSES COMBINED CONTINUE TO BE SIGNIFICANTLY UNDERUTILIZED
RELATIVE TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MINORITIES AND NONMINORITY WOMEN
MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES TO PERFORM WORK IN THE
OVERWHELMING MAJORITY OF THE PROCUREMENT CATEGORIES IN WHICH THE
STATE DOES BUSINESS;
(6) MINORITY PRIME CONTRACTORS ALSO ARE SUBJECT TO
DISCRIMINATION AND CONFRONT ESPECIALLY DAUNTING BARRIERS IN
ATTEMPTING TO COMPETE WITH VERY LARGE AND LONG–ESTABLISHED
NONMINORITY COMPANIES;
(7) DESPITE THE FACT THAT THE STATE HAS EMPLOYED, AND
CONTINUES TO EMPLOY, NUMEROUS AND ROBUST RACE–NEUTRAL REMEDIES,
INCLUDING AGGRESSIVE OUTREACH AND ADVERTISING, TRAINING AND EDUCATION,
SMALL BUSINESS PROGRAMS, EFFORTS TO IMPROVE ACCESS TO CAPITAL, AND
OTHER EFFORTS, THERE IS A STRONG BASIS IN EVIDENCE THAT DISCRIMINATION
PERSISTS EVEN IN PUBLIC SECTOR PROCUREMENT IN WHICH THESE EFFORTS HAVE
BEEN EMPLOYED;
(8) NOTWITHSTANDING THE LEVELS OF PARTICIPATION ACHIEVED
WHEN RACE–CONSCIOUS MEASURES ARE USED, THERE IS CONCERN THAT, IN THE
ABSENCE OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS FOR STATE
PROCUREMENT, THERE WOULD BE A SUBSTANTIAL DECREASE IN THE OVERALL
UTILIZATION OF MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES;
(9) THIS SUBTITLE ENSURES THAT RACE–NEUTRAL EFFORTS WILL BE
USED TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT FEASIBLE AND THAT RACE–CONSCIOUS MEASURES
WILL BE USED ONLY WHERE NECESSARY TO ELIMINATE DISCRIMINATION THAT WAS
NOT ALLEVIATED BY RACE–NEUTRAL EFFORTS;
(10) THIS SUBTITLE CONTINUES AND ENHANCES EFFORTS TO ENSURE
THAT THE STATE LIMITS THE BURDEN ON NONMINORITY, MALE–OWNED
BUSINESSES AS MUCH AS POSSIBLE BY ENSURING THAT ALL GOALS ARE DEVELOPED
USING THE BEST AVAILABLE DATA, WAIVERS ARE AVAILABLE WHENEVER
CONTRACTORS MAKE GOOD FAITH EFFORTS, AND THAT NONMINORITY MEN MAY
QUALIFY FOR CERTIFICATION IF NONMINORITY MEN ARE SOCIALLY AND
ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED;
(11) THIS SUBTITLE ENSURES THAT THE OPERATION OF THE
MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM IS CONSISTENT WITH THE STUDY
– 7 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DATA AND NARROWLY TAILORED TO THE COMPELLING INTERESTS OF THE STATE;
AND
(12) STATE EFFORTS TO SUPPORT REDUCE DISCRIMINATION SUPPORT
THE DEVELOPMENT OF COMPETITIVELY VIABLE MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES WILL HELP REDUCE DISCRIMINATION, CREATE AND
CREATE JOBS FOR ALL CITIZENS OF MARYLAND, HELP GROW THE MARYLAND
ECONOMY, AND FOSTER COMPETITION THAT WILL REDUCE THE COST OF GOODS AND
SERVICES PROCURED BY THE STATE.
14–302.
(a) (10) (iv) 2. The head of the unit shall:
B. forward one copy of the waiver determination to the
[Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(v) On or before July 31 of each year, each unit shall submit directly
to the Board of Public Works and the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs an annual report of waivers requested and waivers granted under this
paragraph.
(12) (i) This paragraph applies after execution of a contract with an
expected degree of minority business enterprise participation.
(ii) The minority business enterprise participation schedule,
including any amendment, shall be attached to and made a part of the executed contract.
(iii) 1. A. Except as provided in subsubsubparagraph B of this
subsubparagraph, for purposes of this subparagraph, good cause for removal of a certified
minority business enterprise after contract execution includes documented
nonperformance by the minority business enterprise or election by the certified minority
business enterprise to cease work on the contract.
B. Failure of a certified minority business enterprise to
provide a bond requested by a contractor in violation of § 13–227 of this article may not be
considered nonperformance by the minority business enterprise.
2. A contractor may not terminate or otherwise cancel the
contract of a certified minority business enterprise subcontractor listed in the minority
business enterprise participation schedule without showing good cause and obtaining the
prior written consent of the minority business enterprise liaison and approval of the head
of the unit.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
3. The unit shall send a copy of the written consent obtained
under subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph to the [Governor’s] Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(iv) A minority business enterprise participation schedule may be
amended to modify minority business enterprise participation after the date of contract
execution only if:
1. it is in the best interest of the State;
2. it is approved by the head of the unit; and
3. the contract is amended.
14–303.
(b) These regulations shall include:
(13) provisions requiring a submission to the unit by minority business
enterprises acknowledging all payments received or any other information requested based
on criteria established by the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs under a contract governed by this subtitle;
(20) a requirement that each unit work with the [Governor’s] Office of
Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs to designate certain procurements as being
excluded from the requirements of § 14–302(a) of this subtitle;
14–305.
(a) (1) Within [90] 60 days after the end of the fiscal year, each unit shall
report to the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs and the
certification agency.
(2) A report under this subsection shall for the preceding fiscal year:
(vi) contain other such information as required by the [Governor’s]
Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs and the certification agency and
approved by the Board.
(4) A report under this subsection shall be in a form prescribed by the
[Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs and the certification
agency and approved by the Board.
(b) (1) On or before [December 31 of] THE 15TH 5TH DAY OF A REGULAR
LEGISLATIVE SESSION each year, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs shall submit to the Board of Public Works and, subject to § 2–1257 of the
– 9 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
State Government Article, to the Legislative Policy Committee and the Joint Committee on
Fair Practices and State Personnel Oversight a report summarizing the information the
Office receives under subsection (a) of this section.
(4) (i) [Beginning with the report submitted under paragraph (1) of this
subsection on December 31, 2023, and each year thereafter, the Governor’s] THE Office of
Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall include in the report SUBMITTED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION an attestation that all units required to
report under subsection (a) of this section are represented in the report.
(ii) To ensure accuracy of the attestation made under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, on or before December 31, 2023, and every 3 years thereafter, the
[Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall conduct an audit
of the Executive Branch of State government to determine what entities are included in the
definition of “unit” under § 11–101 of this article.
(C) (1) EXCEPT FOR THE QUARTER IN WHICH A UNIT IS SUBMITTING AN
ANNUAL REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION, EACH UNIT SHALL REPORT QUARTERLY TO
THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS:
(I) MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION DATA
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM COMPLIANCE
ASSESSMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(V) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BASED ON CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS UNDER A CONTRACT RELATED TO CONTRACTS GOVERNED BY THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
PREPARED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER §
9–4120 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) In this subsection, “mitigating factors” includes documented
nonperformance or unavailability of a minority business enterprise designated for a
contract.
(2) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs and the Office of State Procurement in the Department of General Services, in
consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and the Board of Public Works, shall
adopt by regulation criteria used to determine that a prime contractor has persistently
failed to meet contract goals in the absence of mitigating factors.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(3) The criteria adopted under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall
include the results of the compliance assessments made under subsection (a)(2)(v) of this
section.
(4) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs shall refer prime contractors identified under the criteria adopted under paragraph
(2) of this subsection to the Office of the Attorney General for debarment under §
16–203(d)(4) of this article.
14–308.
(c) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall
make available a fraud hotline for reporting violations of this section.
14–309.
The provisions of §§ 14–301 through 14–305 of this subtitle, and any regulations
adopted under those sections, shall be of no effect and may not be enforced after July 1,
[2026] 2031.
14–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Small business” means:
(1) a certified minority business enterprise, as defined in § 14–301 of this
title, that meets the criteria specified under item (3) of this subsection;
(2) a veteran–owned small business enterprise, as defined in § 14–601 of
this title, that meets the criteria specified under item (3) of this subsection; [or]
(3) a business, other than a broker, that meets the following criteria:
(i) the business is independently owned and operated;
(ii) the business is not a subsidiary of another business;
(iii) the business is not dominant in its field of operation; and
(iv) 1. A. the wholesale operations of the business did not
employ more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
B. the retail operations of the business did not employ more
than 25 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
– 11 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. the manufacturing operations of the business did not
employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
D. the service operations of the business did not employ more
than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the construction operations of the business did not employ
more than 50 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; and
F. the architectural and engineering services of the business
did not employ more than 100 persons in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years; or
2. A. the gross sales of the wholesale operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $4,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
B. the gross sales of the retail operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $3,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
C. the gross sales of the manufacturing operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $2,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years;
D. the gross sales of the service operations of the business did
not exceed an average of $10,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal years;
E. the gross sales of the construction operations of the
business did not exceed an average of $7,000,000 in its most recently completed 3 fiscal
years; and
F. the gross sales of the architectural and engineering
services of the business did not exceed an average of $4,500,000 in its most recently
completed 3 fiscal years; OR
(4) A JOINT VENTURE OF TWO OR MORE PERSONS ASSOCIATED TO
CARRY OUT A SINGLE BUSINESS ACTIVITY FOR A LIMITED PURPOSE OR TIME THAT
MEETS THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED UNDER ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
14–502.1.
(c) (1) A procurement may be exempt from designation under subsection (b) of
this section if the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs
certifies, concurrently with review of any waiver determinations for certified minority
business enterprise participation contract goals, that it is not practicable to do so.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(2) The Office of State Procurement in the Department of General Services
shall assist the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs in
establishing procedures and guidelines for the exemption of procurements under paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
14–503.
(a) (1) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs shall adopt regulations to establish procedures for compiling and maintaining a
comprehensive bidder’s list of qualified small businesses that shall be posted on the
Internet.
(2) THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH A CERTIFICATION REVIEW
PROCESS.
(b) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall:
(1) establish guidelines for Small Business Reserve Program
administration;
(2) ensure agency compliance with the Small Business Reserve Program;
(3) provide training and technical assistance to agency personnel; and
(4) collect data regarding the State’s utilization of small business reserve
vendors.
(c) Each unit shall ensure compliance with the regulations set forth in subsection
(a) of this section.
14–504.1.
(a) The certification agency, in consultation with the [Governor’s] Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs, shall develop an outreach program to increase the
participation of small businesses that are owned by economically disadvantaged
individuals participating in the Small Business Reserve Program.
14–505.
(a) Within 60 days after the enactment of the budget bill by the General
Assembly, each unit shall submit a report to the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs that complies with the reporting requirements set forth in
COMAR 21.11.01.06.
– 13 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Within [90] 60 days after the end of each fiscal year, each unit shall
submit a report to the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs
that complies with the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) For the preceding fiscal year, the report shall:
(i) state the total number and the dollar value of awards the unit
made to small businesses under designated small business reserve contracts;
(ii) state the total number and the dollar value of awards the unit
made to small businesses under nondesignated small business reserve contracts, including
purchase card procurements;
(iii) state the total dollar value of awards the unit made under
procurement contracts; and
(iv) contain other such information as required by the [Governor’s]
Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(C) (1) EXCEPT FOR THE QUARTER IN WHICH A UNIT IS SUBMITTING AN
ANNUAL REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION, EACH UNIT SHALL REPORT QUARTERLY TO
THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS:
(I) SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE ANNUAL DESIGNATED AND
NONDESIGNATED ACHIEVEMENT AWARDS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BASED ON CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS
AFFAIRS UNDER A DESIGNATED OR UNDESIGNATED CONTRACT AS RELATED TO
CONTRACTS GOVERNED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
PREPARED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER §
9–4120 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) On or before [December 31] THE 15TH 5TH DAY OF A REGULAR
LEGISLATIVE SESSION of each year, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs shall submit to the Board of Public Works and, subject to § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, to the Legislative Policy Committee a report summarizing
the information the Office receives under subsection (b) of this section.
14–604.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(A) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall:
(1) adopt regulations to implement this subtitle;
(2) establish procedures for tracking and reporting participation of
veteran–owned small business enterprises under this subtitle; and
(3) on or before [December 1] THE 15TH 5TH DAY OF A REGULAR
LEGISLATIVE SESSION of each year, report to the Legislative Policy Committee on:
(i) the number and dollar value of contracts awarded to
veteran–owned small business enterprises under this subtitle, including the total dollar
value of payments made to veteran–owned small business enterprises under existing
contracts; and
(ii) an evaluation of the effectiveness of the program under this
subtitle.
(B) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, AND
EACH QUARTER THEREAFTER, EACH UNIT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE OFFICE
OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS ON:
(I) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3)(I)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE OFFICE.
(2) A REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
PREPARED IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER §
9–4120 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – State Government
9–1A–10.
(A) (1) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SECTION.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, A LICENSEE SHALL COMPLY WITH THE STATE’S MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(a) (B) (1) (i) An applicant or a licensee is subject to:
– 15 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. THE REQUIREMENT TO PUT FORTH A GOOD FAITH
EFFORT TO MEET the minority business participation goal established for a unit by the
Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs under §
14–302(a)(1)(ii) of the State Finance and Procurement Article; and
2. any other corresponding provisions of law under Title 14,
Subtitle 3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The minority business participation goal shall apply to:
1. construction related to video lottery terminals; and
2. procurement related to the operation of video lottery
terminals, including procurement of equipment and ongoing services.
(2) If the county in which a video lottery facility will be located has higher
minority business participation requirements than the State as described in paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the applicant shall meet the county’s minority business participation
requirements to the extent possible.
(3) A county in which a video lottery facility will be located may impose
local business, local minority business participation, and local hiring requirements to the
extent authorized by local law and permitted by the United States Constitution.
(4) Any collective bargaining agreement or agreements, including a project
labor agreement or a neutrality agreement, entered into by an applicant or licensee may
not negate the requirements of this subsection.
(5) If an applicant for employment at a video lottery facility believes that
the applicant has been discriminated against in the employment process, the applicant may
appeal the employment decision to the local human relations board in the county where the
facility is located.
(6) Notwithstanding any collective bargaining agreement or agreements, a
licensee shall:
(i) provide health insurance coverage for its employees; and
(ii) give a preference to hiring qualified employees from the
communities within 10 miles of the video lottery facility.
(7) A licensee shall:
(i) provide retirement benefits for its employees; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(ii) if the licensee is a racetrack licensee, provide retirement benefits
to its video lottery operation employees that are equivalent to the level of benefits provided
to the racetrack employees who are eligible under the Maryland Racetrack Employees
Pension Fund.
(8) Notwithstanding any collective bargaining agreement or agreements, if
the licensee is a racetrack location, the licensee shall provide health insurance coverage to
all employees of the racetrack, including the employees of the racetrack on the backstretch
of the racetrack.
(b) (C) (1) The Commission shall ensure that a video lottery operation
licensee complies with the requirements of subsection (a)(1) (B)(1) and (2) of this section
as a condition of holding the video lottery operation license.
(2) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs shall monitor a licensee’s compliance with subsection (a)(1) (B)(1) and (2) of this
section.
(3) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs shall report to the Commission at least every 6 months on the compliance of
licensees with subsection (a)(1) (B)(1) and (2) of this section.
(4) If the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs reports that a licensee is not in compliance with subsection (a)(1) (B)(1) and (2) of
this section, the Commission may take immediate action to ensure the compliance of the
licensee.
(c) (D) On or after July 1, [2026] 2031, the provisions of subsections (a)(1)
(B)(1) and (2) and (b) (C) of this section and any regulations adopted under subsections
(a)(1) (B)(1) and (2) and (b) (C) of this section shall be of no effect and may not be enforced.
9–1E–07.
(b) (1) The findings and evidence relied on by the General Assembly for the
continuation of the Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article are incorporated in this subsection.
(2) To the extent practicable and authorized by the United States
Constitution, a sports wagering licensee shall comply with the State’s Minority Business
Enterprise Program.
(3) (i) On or before 6 months after the issuance of a sports wagering
license under this subtitle, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and the sports wagering
licensee, shall establish a clear plan for setting reasonable and appropriate minority
– 17 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
business enterprise participation goals and procedures for the procurement of goods and
services related to sports wagering, including procurement of construction, equipment, and
ongoing services.
(ii) To the extent practicable, the goals and procedures specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be based on the requirements of Title 14, Subtitle
3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the regulations implementing that
subtitle.
(4) On or after July 1, [2026] 2031, the provisions of this subsection and
any regulations adopted under this subsection shall be of no effect and may not be enforced.
9–4114.
(a) There is a Governor’s Subcabinet on Socioeconomic Procurement
Participation.
(b) The Governor’s Subcabinet is composed of:
(1) the [Special] Secretary of [the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs] SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY, who shall serve as chair
of the Subcabinet;
(2) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of General Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(9) THE SECRETARY OF LABOR, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
[(9)] (10) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee;
[(10)] (11) the Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
[(11)] (12) the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families, or the
Secretary’s Designee;
[(12)] (13) the Chief Procurement Officer for the State, or the Chief
Procurement Officer’s designee;
[(13)] (14) the Minority Business Enterprise Ombudsman, or the
Ombudsman’s designee; and
[(14)] (15) any other head of a department or agency that is accountable to
the Governor, as deemed necessary by the Governor.
(c) The Governor’s Subcabinet shall:
(1) meet:
(i) a minimum of once each quarter; and
(ii) at a frequency deemed appropriate by the chair;
(2) study socioeconomic procurement programs in other states to identify
successes and best practices;
(3) develop accountability measures for procurement forecasts, strategic
plans, Procurement Review Group processes, and liaison officer accountability;
(4) work with the Office of State Procurement to implement process
improvements that directly impact socioeconomic procurement businesses’ ability to fairly
compete for and understand State contracting opportunities;
(5) identify and recommend statutory and regulatory reforms to
strengthen and improve the State’s socioeconomic procurement programs; and
(6) recommend actions to make improvements to the Small Business
Reserve Program, the Minority Business Enterprise Program, and the Veteran Small
Business Enterprise Program.
(d) On or before December 31, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Governor’s Subcabinet shall report to the Governor on the Governor’s Subcabinet’s
activities, progress, and recommendations.
Chapter 553 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapters 137 and 138 of the Acts
of 2023 and Chapters 620 and 621 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the certification agency
designated by the Board of Public Works under § 14–303(b) of the State Finance and
– 19 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Procurement Article to certify and decertify minority business enterprises, in consultation
with the Office of the Attorney General and the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs, shall initiate an analysis of the Minority Business Enterprise
Program requirements of § 10A–404 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the
disparity study submitted in accordance with this Act to evaluate compliance with the
requirements of any federal and constitutional requirements and submit a report on the
analysis to the Legislative Policy Committee of the General Assembly, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on or before September 30, [2025] 2030.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the certification agency
designated by the Board of Public Works under § 14–303(b) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article to certify and decertify minority business enterprises, in consultation
with the Office of the Attorney General and the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs, shall initiate an analysis of the disparity study submitted in
accordance with this Act to determine if it applies to the type of work that will be likely to
be performed by an approved applicant with respect to an offshore wind project under §
7–704.1(i) of the Public Utilities Article as enacted by Section 2 of this Act and submit a
report on the analysis to the Legislative Policy Committee of the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on or before September 30,
[2025] 2030.
Chapter 728 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapters 137 and 138 of the Acts
of 2023 and Chapters 620 and 621 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before July 1, [2026]
2031, the Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs,
in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation and the Attorney General, shall
establish policies and guidelines for the implementation of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
[2026] 2031, the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall
report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on the establishment of minority business enterprise subgoals in accordance with
this Act, including:
(1) whether the establishment of minority business enterprise subgoals
was practicable based on the type of capital project; and
(2) whether any changes should be made to the capital minority business
enterprise subgoal framework established by this Act.
Chapter 154 of the Acts of 2012, as amended by Chapters 200 and 201 of the Acts
of 2013, Chapter 340 of the Acts of 2017, Chapter 117 of the Acts of 2022,
Chapters 137 and 138 of the Acts of 2023, and Chapters 620 and 621 of the Acts of
2025
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Certification Agency, in
consultation with the General Assembly and the Office of the Attorney General, shall
initiate a study of the Minority Business Enterprise Program to evaluate the Program’s
continued compliance with the requirements of the Croson decision and any subsequent
federal or constitutional requirements. In preparation for the study, the Board of Public
Works may adopt regulations authorizing a unit of State government to require bidders
and offerors to submit information necessary for the conduct of the study. The Board of
Public Works may designate that certain information received in accordance with
regulations adopted under this section shall be confidential. Notwithstanding that certain
information may be designated by the Board of Public Works as confidential, the
Certification Agency may provide the information to any person that is under contract with
the Certification Agency to assist in conducting the study. The study shall also evaluate
race–neutral programs and other methods that can be used to address the needs of minority
businesses. The final report on the study shall be submitted to the Legislative Policy
Committee of the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on or before September 30, [2025] 2030, so that the General Assembly may review
the report before the [2026] 2031 Session.
Chapter 641 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapters 137 and 138 of the Acts
of 2023 and Chapters 620 and 621 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(b) The certification agency and the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs shall submit the findings of the study required under subsection
(a) of this section to the Legislative Policy Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on or before December 31, [2026] 2031, so that the General
Assembly may review the findings before the [2027] 2032 Session.
[(c)] (B) The State Retirement and Pension System shall provide to the
certification agency any information deemed necessary to assess the need for remedial
measures to assist minority and women–owned businesses in the brokerage and
investment management services industry and market.
(d) The [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs, in
consultation with the certification agency and the Office of the Attorney General, shall
develop race– and gender–neutral approaches to address the needs of minority and
women–owned businesses in the brokerage and investment management services industry
and market and submit its report to the Legislative Policy Committee, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on or before December 31, [2026] 2031, so that
the General Assembly may review, consider, and adopt race– and gender–neutral
alternatives to remedial measures that are not race and gender neutral.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
– 21 –

Ch. 82 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 22 –